Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
Req. No. 2266 Page 1

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3205.15 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Legislature finds that:
1. Charlie Kirk, born on October 14, 1993, and tragically
martyred by assassination on September 10, 2025, was a fearless
defender of free speech, the founder and chief executive officer of
Turning Point USA, and a transformative force in empowering young
Americans to engage in open, robust discourse on college campuses;
2. In his honor and to perpetuate his legacy as a martyr for
truth, faith, and the First Amendment, each institution within The
Oklahoma State System of Higher Education shall establish on its
campus a dedicated square or plaza; and
3. Each such dedicated square or plaza shall be designated as
the Charlie Kirk Memorial Plaza to remind all to foster an
environment of intellectual freedom, civic engagement, and the
principles Kirk championed, ensuring that future generations
remember his courage, faith, sacrifice, and contributions to
American liberty.
B. Each institution of higher education within The Oklahoma
State System of Higher Education shall designate and develop a
prominent area on its main campus as the Charlie Kirk Memorial
Plaza. The square or plaza shall be located in a highly visible and
easily accessible location, such as near the central quad, student
union, or main entrance pathways, to maximize public awareness and
Req. No. 2266 Page 2

utilization.
C. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall
establish guidelines for the minimum size and configuration of each
square or plaza required by subsection B of this section. The
guidelines shall provide allowances for proportionally reduced
dimensions at smaller institutions of higher education based on
campus acreage, student enrollment, and available space.
Notwithstanding such guidelines, all squares or plazas shall meet
the prominence and accessibility requirements of subsection B of
this section.
D. Prior to finalizing any square or plaza, the governing board
of each institution of higher education within The Oklahoma State
System of Higher Education shall submit a detailed plan to the
Legislature no later than March 1, 2027. The plan shall include a
proposed location, size, design elements, and a projected timeline
for completion. The Legislature shall review and approve, through a
resolution, the location and size of each square or plaza. The
Legislature may, through a resolution, approve or direct
modifications to any aspects of the proposed square or plaza design
including, but not limited to, location, size, landscaping, signage,
and commemorative features to ensure consistency with the purpose of
the square or plaza to honor the legacy of Charlie Kirk.
E. Each square or plaza shall include permanent signage
commemorating Charlie Kirk’s courage and faith and explaining the
Req. No. 2266 Page 3

significance of Charlie Kirk as a voice of a generation, modern
civil rights leader, vocal Christian, martyr for truth and faith,
and free speech advocate. Square or plaza plans shall include a
statue of Charlie Kirk sitting at a table with an empty seat across
from him or a statue of Charlie Kirk and his wife standing and
holding their children in their arms as a central element of the
square or plaza design. The statue design and size shall be
approved by the Legislature as part of the overall design review and
approval process.
F. 1. Institutions of higher education within The Oklahoma
State System of Higher Education are authorized to accept donations
from the National Endowment for the Arts and any private, corporate,
or public source to fund the development, maintenance, and
enhancement of the squares or plazas and any associated statues.
Subject to the availability of funds, the Legislature may
appropriate donation matching funds to encourage broad-based support
for the squares or plazas.
2. Private institutions of higher education in this state may
apply to the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education for grant
funds to establish a Charlie Kirk Memorial Plaza on their campuses.
Subject to the availability of funds, grant funds shall be provided
in a manner consistent with funds provided to institutions pursuant
to paragraph 1 of this subsection for a square or plaza of similar
size and style.
Req. No. 2266 Page 4

G. 1. Each institution of higher education within The Oklahoma
State System of Higher Education shall complete construction and
full operational readiness of its Charlie Kirk Memorial Plaza no
later than March 1, 2028.
2. Failure to meet the deadline established by paragraph 1 of
this subsection shall result in a punitive fine of one percent (1%)
of the institution of higher education’s appropriated budget for
each month of noncompliance. Collected fines shall be deposited
into the General Revenue Fund.
3. The Legislature, by concurrent resolution, may extend the
deadline established by paragraph 1 of this subsection for
individual institutions of higher education that have started but
not yet completed construction of the square or plaza.
4. By March 1, 2027, and by March 1 each subsequent year, the
State Regents shall submit a report to the Legislature on progress
and compliance with the provisions of this section.
H. 1. The governing board of each institution of higher
education within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education shall
take appropriate security measures to ensure the Charlie Kirk
Memorial Plaza and statues of Charlie Kirk are protected from
vandalism and defacement. The measures may include, but are not
limited to, security camera systems and physical barriers.
2. Any student, employee, or faculty member of an institution
of higher education found to have engaged in the defacement or
Req. No. 2266 Page 5

vandalism of the Charlie Kirk Memorial Plaza or a statue of Charlie
Kirk shall be immediately terminated from enrollment or employment,
as applicable, in addition to other penalties which may include, but
are not limited to, monetary fines sufficient to cover the cost of
repairing any damage caused.
3. The State Regents shall establish procedures for rapidly
investigating and enforcing the provisions of this subsection while
prioritizing the preservation of the Charlie Kirk Memorial Plaza and
statue of Charlie Kirk.
I. The State Regents shall promulgate rules to implement the
provisions of this section including reporting requirements and
guidelines for usage of the square or plaza to ensure it remains a
neutral forum for protected speech.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
60-2-2266 EB 09/16/2025
Req. No. 2266 Page 6